Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Chapter 8 Employment Offices and Agencies

Cross references. —

As to definition of “employment office,” in connection with employment compensation, see § 27-3-102(a)(viii).

As to state employment service, see §

27-3-605

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

27 Am. Jur. 2d Employment Agencies § 1 et seq.

§ 27-8-101.
Licenses required; fees; posting.

No person, firm or corporation shall open, operate or maintain in this state any employment office or agency for the purpose of furnishing employers with persons seeking employment at manual labor or in clerical, industrial, commercial or business pursuits, or for the purpose of securing employment for such described persons, or where a fee, commission or other consideration is charged or exacted or received from applicants either for employment or for help, without first obtaining a license for the same from the department of workforce services. The uniform fee for such license in cities of five thousand (5,000) inhabitants and over shall be twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per annum, and in cities containing less than five thousand inhabitants, ten dollars ($10.00) per annum. Every license shall contain a designation of the city, street and number of the building in which such office or agency is conducted, and such license together with a copy of this act shall be posted in a conspicuous place in each and every employment agency.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 59, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3463; R.S. 1931, § 65-401; C.S. 1945, § 54-401; W.S. 1957, § 27-246; Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

Cross references. —

For licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of title 33.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” at the end of the first sentence.

§ 27-8-102.
Termination and cost of license.

All licenses issued after this act [§§

27-8-101

through

27-8-111

] takes effect shall terminate on the thirty-first day of December of each year, and shall be paid for at the rate per year established in this act; provided, however, that no license for any fractional part of the year shall be issued for any sum less than one-third of the full annual rate, and that fractional months shall be counted as full months in every case.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 59, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 3464; R.S. 1931, § 65-402; C.S. 1945, § 54-402; W.S. 1957, § 27-247.

§ 27-8-103.
Bond of licensee.

The department of workforce services shall require with each application for a license a bond in the sum of five hundred dollars ($500.00) with one (1) or more sureties to be approved by the department, and conditioned that the obligors will not violate any of the duties, terms, conditions, provisions or requirements of this act, or of other laws germane hereto. For any violation of the conditions of said bond, the department is authorized to commence and prosecute an action or actions on said bond or bonds in the name of the state of Wyoming, through the attorney general or other proper prosecuting officer.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 59, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 3465; R.S. 1931, § 65-403; C.S. 1945, § 54-403; W.S. 1957, § 27-248; Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment.”

§ 27-8-104.
Revocation of license; complaint; hearing.

Whenever a written complaint shall be filed with the department of workforce services stating that any party so licensed as aforesaid, shall have violated any of the provisions of this act, the department shall give to said licensee notice of such complaint and appoint a day for a hearing thereon. If after a full and fair hearing, the department finds that the party licensed has violated any of the provisions of this act, the department is authorized to revoke the license theretofore issued to said party.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 59, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 3466; R.S. 1931, § 65-404; C.S. 1945, § 54-404; W.S. 1957, § 27-249; Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment.”

§ 27-8-105.
Licensed agencies to maintain registers.

It shall be the duty of every licensed agency to keep a register in which shall be entered with dates the name and address of every person who shall make application for help or servants, and the name and nature of such employment for which such help shall be wanted. Such register shall, at all reasonable hours be kept open to the inspection and examination of the department of workforce services.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 59, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 3467; R.S. 1931, § 65-405; C.S. 1945, § 54-405; W.S. 1957, § 27-250; Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment.”

§ 27-8-106.
Registration fee.

Where a registration fee is charged for receiving or filing application for employment of help, such fee shall in no case exceed the sum of one dollar ($1.00), unless the salary or wages to be paid shall be more than three dollars ($3.00) per day, in which case a fee of not more than two dollars ($2.00) may be charged. A duplicate receipt shall be given for such fee, (one (1) copy to be kept by the employee and the other by the employer) in which receipt there shall be stated the name and address of the applicant, the date of such application, the amount of the fee, and the nature of the work to be done or the situation to be procured. In the event that the said applicant shall not obtain a situation or employment through such licensed agency, then after the expiration of three (3) days from the time of registration such licensed agency shall repay and return to such applicant, upon demand being made therefor, the full amount of the fee paid or deposited by said applicant to such licensed agency.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 59, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 3468; R.S. 1931, § 65-406; C.S. 1945, § 54-406; W.S. 1957, § 27-251.

§ 27-8-107.
Fraudulent notices or advertisements, and false information or promises prohibited.

No licensed agency shall publish or cause to be published any false or fraudulent notice or advertisement, or give any false information or make any false promise concerning or relating to work or employment to anyone who shall apply for employment, and no licensed agency shall make any false entry in the register to be kept as herein provided.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 59, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 3469; R.S. 1931, § 65-407; C.S. 1945, § 54-407; W.S. 1957, § 27-252.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of employment agency for personal injury or property damage suffered by employer from acts of referred employee, or by employee from acts of referred employer, 41 ALR4th 531.

§ 27-8-108.
Duty of department to file complaints of violations; duty to enforce.

It shall be the duty of the department of workforce services, when informed of any violation of this act, to file complaint of such violation with the attorney general or with the district attorney for the county in which such violation is alleged to have occurred and it shall be the duty of the official informed to institute proceedings for the enforcement of the penalties.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 59, § 8; C.S. 1920, § 3470; R.S. 1931, § 65-408; C.S. 1945, § 54-408; W.S. 1957, § 27-253; Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment.”

§ 27-8-109.
Department of workforce services to account.

All money or monies received from fees under this act shall be forthwith accounted for by the department of workforce services and turned over to the state treasurer, taking the state treasurer’s receipt for the same. Such monies shall become a part of the state general fund.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 59, § 10; C.S. 1920, § 3472; R.S. 1931, § 65-410; C.S. 1945, § 54-410; W.S. 1957, § 27-254; Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

Cross references. —

For duty of commissioners of department of revenue and taxation to coordinate the collection of licenses and fees, see §

39-11-102

.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment.”

§ 27-8-110.
Free employment bureaus and university placement services excepted.

Free employment bureaus and placement services of the University of Wyoming now or hereafter organized or established in this state, are not subject to this act [§§

27-8-101

through

27-8-111

].

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 59, § 11; C.S. 1920, § 3473; R.S. 1931, § 65-411; C.S. 1945, § 54-411; W.S. 1957, § 27-255; Laws 1981, ch. 58, § 1.

§ 27-8-111.
Penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this act [§§

27-8-101

through

27-8-111

] shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not exceeding six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment as the court may direct.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 59, § 9; C.S. 1920, § 3471; R.S. 1931, § 65-409; C.S. 1945, § 54-409; W.S. 1957, § 27-256.